California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Franchise Tax Board shall aid the department in the recovery of overpayments of unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to Section 1379 for up to six years after the date of the service of the notice of overpayment determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 28.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1384.

Amounts collected by the Controller for benefit overpayment accounts, pursuant to Section 12419.2 of the Government Code, shall be deposited in the fund from which the overpayment was made, except that the amounts collected to offset the costs of collections shall be deposited in the Unemployment Administration Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1581, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Between Terms Unemployment Compensation for Nonprofessional Employees of State Special Schools [1451. - 1454.]

1451.

Nonprofessional employees of the Fremont and Riverside campuses of the California School for the Deaf, the Fremont campus of the California School for the Blind, and the diagnostic schools for individuals with neurological disabilities located in Los Angeles, San Francisco, and Fresno, shall be eligible for benefits provided by this chapter, on the same terms and conditions as are specified by this part, Part 3 (commencing with Section 3501), and Part 4 (commencing with Section 4001), for all other individuals, except where inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. Except where inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, the provisions of this division and authorized regulations shall apply to any matter arising pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1452.

Notwithstanding Section 1253.3, between terms unemployment compensation benefits are payable by the Controller, from funds appropriated for support of the State Department of Education and allocated to the state special schools, upon authorization by the Employment Development Department to individuals who are eligible to receive these benefits under this chapter. These benefits shall only be paid for weeks of unemployment occurring between school terms and during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess when other benefits are denied solely by reason of Section 1253.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1488, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1453.

(a) There shall be transferred to the Employment Development Department from funds appropriated for support of the State Department of Education and allocated to the state special schools, at the times and in the manner provided in subdivision (b), an amount equal to the additional cost to the Employment Development Department for added administrative work arising out of this chapter.

(b) The director shall determine the sums he or she estimates the department will be entitled to receive from the State Department of Education under this section for each fiscal year, reduced or increased by any sum by which he or she finds that his or her estimates for any prior fiscal year were greater or less than the amounts which were actually required. The sum of the amounts transferred or expended pursuant to Section 1452, subdivision (a), and this subdivision in any one fiscal year shall not exceed the amount appropriated in the then current fiscal year to the State Department of Education for the purposes of this chapter.

(c) The director may require from the State Department of Education such employment, wage, financial, statistical, or other information and reports, properly verified, as may be deemed necessary by the director to carry out his or her duties under this division, which shall be filed with the director at the time and in the manner prescribed by him or her.

(d) The director may tabulate and publish information obtained pursuant to this chapter in statistical form and may divulge the name of the employing unit.

(e) The State Department of Education shall provide each employee subject to this chapter, at the end of each school term, with written information advising the employee of benefit rights pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1488, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1454.

An individual who receives any unemployment compensation benefits otherwise payable irrespective of this chapter, including retroactive unemployment compensation benefits paid pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1253.3, who has received benefits under this chapter for the same period, shall be liable for repayment to the state of the amount of benefits paid under this chapter for that period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1488, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Financial Provisions [1501. - 1611.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Deposit Account [1501. - 1501.]

1501.

The director may in accordance with law deposit for the purpose of clearance by the director all money collected under this division, in a state or national bank in this state. After clearance the money so deposited shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund as prescribed in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Unemployment Fund [1521. - 1537.]

1521.

The Unemployment Fund is continued in existence as a special fund, separate and apart from all public money or funds of this state. This fund shall consist of (1) all employer contributions collected under this division; (2) interest earned upon any money in the fund; (3) any property or securities acquired through the use of money belonging to the fund; (4) all earnings of such property or securities; (5) all money credited to this state’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund pursuant to Section 903 of the Social Security Act, as amended; (6) all assessments collected pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1375.1; and (7) all other money received for the fund from any other source. All money in the fund shall be
 mingled and undivided.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money in the Unemployment Fund and in the various accounts of that fund, except any money deposited pursuant to Section 1528.5, is continuously appropriated for the purposes authorized in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 783, Sec. 14.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1522.

The Unemployment Fund shall be administered by the director exclusively for the purposes of this division without liability upon the part of the State beyond the amounts paid into and earned by the fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 313.)
-------------------------------------------

1523.

Withdrawals by the director from the Unemployment Fund are exempted from the operation of Sections 925.4 and 925.6 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1524.

The State Treasurer is ex officio the treasurer and custodian of the Unemployment Fund. He shall administer the fund in accordance with the directions of the director. The official bond of the State Treasurer shall cover the faithful performance of his duties as treasurer of the Unemployment Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 313.)
-------------------------------------------

1525.

There shall be maintained within the fund three separate accounts:

(a) A clearing account.

(b) An Unemployment Trust Fund account.

(c) A benefit account.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 313.)
-------------------------------------------

1526.

All contributions and amounts payable to the Unemployment Fund after proper clearance shall be forwarded to the Treasurer who shall immediately deposit them in the clearing account.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 313.)
-------------------------------------------

1526.1.

All withheld income taxes and amounts payable to the Personal Income Tax Fund after proper clearance shall be forwarded to the Treasurer who shall immediately deposit them in that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1526.2.

All worker contributions and amounts payable to the Disability Fund after proper clearance shall be forwarded to the Treasurer who shall immediately deposit them in that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1526.3.

All amounts specified in Section 1585 payable to the Contingent Fund after proper clearance shall be forwarded to the Treasurer who shall immediately deposit them in that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1526.4.

All amounts payable to the Unemployment Administration Fund after proper clearance shall be forwarded to the Treasurer who shall immediately deposit them in that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1527.

Immediately after clearance, all money in the clearing account except interest on contributions, and penalties collected shall be deposited in or invested in the obligations of the Unemployment Trust Fund of the United States of America or its authorized agent to the credit of this State, any provisions of law in this State relating to the deposit, administration, release, or disbursement of money in the possession or custody of this State to the contrary notwithstanding. The amounts so deposited or invested shall be entered in the Unemployment Trust Fund Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1165.)
-------------------------------------------

1528.

The benefit account consists of all money requisitioned from this State’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund, except money requisitioned for administration pursuant to Section 1528.5, and any money so requisitioned, except money requisitioned for administration pursuant to Section 1528.5, shall be transferred out of the Unemployment Trust Fund account into the benefit account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1814.)
-------------------------------------------

1528.5.

(a) Money credited to the account of this state in the Unemployment Trust Fund by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States of America pursuant to Section 903 of the Social Security Act, as amended, may not be requisitioned from this state’s account or used except for the payment of benefits and for the payment of expenses incurred for the administration of this part. Such money may be requisitioned pursuant to Section 1529 for the payment of benefits. Such money may also be requisitioned and used for the payment of expenses incurred for the administration of this part but only pursuant to a specific appropriation by the Legislature and only if the expenses are incurred and the money is requisitioned after the enactment of an appropriation law which:

(1) Specifies the purposes for which such money is appropriated and the amounts appropriated therefor.

(2) Limits the period within which such money may be obligated to a period ending not more than two years after the date of the enactment of the appropriation law.

(3) Provides that the total amount which may be obligated shall be limited to the restrictions specified by, and charged in accordance with, Section 903(c)(2)(D) of the Social Security Act, as amended.

(b) Money appropriated pursuant to this section for the payment of expenses of administration shall be requisitioned as needed for the payment of obligations incurred under such appropriation and, upon requisition, shall be deposited in the Unemployment Administration Fund, but, until expended, shall remain a part of the Unemployment Fund. The director and the Controller shall maintain a separate record of the deposit, obligation, expenditure, and return of funds so deposited. Any money so deposited which will not be expended shall be returned promptly to the account of this state in the Unemployment Trust Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 397.)
-------------------------------------------

1529.

Except as provided in Section 1528.5, money shall be requisitioned from this State’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund solely for the payment of benefits and in accordance with authorized regulations. The director shall from time to time requisition from the Unemployment Trust Fund such amounts, not exceeding the amounts standing to this State’s account therein, as he deems necessary for the payment of benefits for a reasonable future period. Upon receipt thereof the Treasurer shall deposit such money in the benefit account of the Unemployment Fund. Any balance of money requisitioned from the Unemployment Trust Fund which remains unclaimed or unpaid in the benefit account after the expiration of the period for which such sums were requisitioned shall either be considered in preparing subsequent estimates and may be utilized for the payment of benefits during succeeding periods, or, in the discretion of the director, shall be redeposited with the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States of America, to the credit of this State’s account in the Unemployment Trust Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1814.)
-------------------------------------------

1530.

The provisions of this article to the extent that they relate to the Unemployment Trust Fund, shall be operative only so long as that fund continues to exist and so long as the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States of America continues to maintain for this State a separate book account of all funds deposited therein by this State for benefit purposes, together with this State’s proportionate share of the earnings of the Unemployment Trust Fund, from which no other state nor the United States is permitted to make withdrawals. If and when such Unemployment Trust Fund ceases to exist, or such separate book account is no longer maintained, all money, properties, or securities therein, belonging to the Unemployment Fund of this State shall be transferred to the treasurer of the Unemployment Fund, who shall hold, invest, transfer, sell, deposit, and release such money, properties, or securities in a manner approved by the director in accordance with the provisions of this division. Such money shall be invested in bonds or other interest-bearing obligations of the United States of America or the State of California. Such investment shall at all times be so made that all the assets of the fund shall always be readily convertible into cash when needed for the payment of benefits. The Treasurer shall dispose of securities or other properties belonging to the Unemployment Fund only under the direction of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 313.)
-------------------------------------------

1531.

The director shall, without presenting vouchers and itemized statements therefor, withdraw from the benefit account any sums which he deems necessary for the payment of benefits for a reasonable future period. The Controller shall draw his warrant for any claim presented by the director for the payment of benefits under this account and the Treasurer shall pay the warrant. Upon the withdrawal thereof, such sums shall be deposited in a benefit payment account in such bank, savings and loan association, or public depository and under such conditions as the director determines, with the approval of the Department of Finance. Such bank, savings and loan association, or public depository shall be one in which general funds of the state may be deposited, but no public deposit insurance charge or premium shall be paid out of the benefit payment account. The director may, out of funds available for administration, pay premiums on insurance for the protection of money in his possession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

1532.

Money in the benefit payment account shall be used solely to pay benefits pursuant to authorized regulations and no other disbursement shall be made therefrom, but amounts erroneously and illegally deposited in such account may be refunded therefrom, except that money credited to this State’s account pursuant to Section 903 of the Social Security Act, as amended, shall be used exclusively as provided in Section 1528.5. The procedure prescribed by such regulations shall be deemed to satisfy and shall be in lieu of any and all statutory requirements not contained in this division of specific appropriation or other form of release by state officers of money in their custody prior to expenditure which might otherwise be applicable to withdrawals from the benefit payment account. Any balance of money withdrawn from the benefit account which remains unclaimed or unpaid in the benefit payment account after the expiration of the period for which such sums were withdrawn shall be considered in preparing subsequent estimates and may be utilized for the payment of benefits during succeeding periods or, in the discretion of the director, shall be redeposited in the benefit account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1814.)
-------------------------------------------

1533.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, money in the clearing and benefit accounts may be deposited by the Treasurer, under the direction of the director, in any bank, savings and loan association, or public depositary in which public funds of the state may be deposited, but no public deposit insurance charge or premium shall be paid out of the fund. Money in the clearing and benefit accounts shall not be commingled with other state funds, but shall be maintained in a separate account on the books of the depositary. Such money shall be secured by the bank or public depositary to the same extent and in the same manner as required under Chapter 4, Part 2, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code if deposited in a bank or public depository, not a savings and loan association or to the same extent and in the same manner as required under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 16600) of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code if deposited in a savings and loan association and collateral pledged shall be maintained in a separate custody account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

1534.

Refunds or judgments payable pursuant to this part, may be paid from the clearing account or from the benefit account with respect to any money erroneously deposited therein, upon warrants issued by the Controller under the direction of and in accordance with authorized regulations, except that money credited to this state’s account pursuant to Section 903 of the Social Security Act, as amended, shall be used exclusively as provided in Section 1528.5. Refunds of interest, penalties, and fines and interest payable on refunds and judgments pursuant to this division may not be paid from the benefit account but may be paid from the clearing account to the extent that interest, penalties, and fines collected are currently on deposit in that account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1025, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

1535.

During such time as the Federal Social Security Act and Federal Unemployment Tax Act are amended so as to remove the requirement that all money withdrawn from the Unemployment Fund be used solely in the payment of unemployment compensation, exclusive of expenses of administration, and for refunds of sums erroneously paid into such fund and refunds paid in accordance with the provisions of Section 3305(b) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, then notwithstanding any other provisions of this division to the contrary there is hereby continuously appropriated out of the Unemployment Fund for the purpose of administering this division, including salaries and other expenses of the department and the acquisition of necessary real property, all amounts collected under Section 993.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 350.)
-------------------------------------------

1536.

Any amounts determined by the director or his authorized representatives to be payable to employing units as refunds of contributions erroneously paid which are unclaimed at the end of three years from such determination shall be included in the revenue to the Unemployment Fund or in the case of interest or penalties, to the Contingent Fund. The employing unit or person entitled to such payment shall not thereafter maintain any claim, action or proceeding with respect to such amounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

1537.

Whenever any warrant drawn on an account in the Unemployment Fund or on the Unemployment Administration Fund or the Contingent Fund by the Controller remains unclaimed after one year the amount thereof shall revert to the account and the fund from which the amount was payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 678, Sec. 6.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration Fund [1555. - 1562.]

1555.

The Unemployment Administration Fund is continued in existence as a special fund in the State Treasury. All money which is deposited or paid into this fund, except any money deposited pursuant to Section 1528.5, is hereby continuously appropriated and made available to the director for the purposes authorized in this article without regard to fiscal years. Any balances in this fund shall not lapse at any time, but shall be continuously available to the director for expenditure consistent with the purposes authorized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 649.)
-------------------------------------------

1556.

Except for money deposited pursuant to Section 1528.5, the Unemployment Administration Fund shall consist of all money appropriated by this state for the purpose of administering this part, money deposited for the purpose of expenditure pursuant to Section 1558.5, and all money received from the United States of America, or any agency thereof, including the Secretary of Labor, or from any other source for such purpose. Money requisitioned and deposited in this fund pursuant to Section 1528.5 shall remain part of the Unemployment Fund and shall be used only in accordance with the conditions specified in that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1025, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

1557.

Money in the Unemployment Administration Fund shall not be commingled with other state funds, but shall be maintained in a separate account on the books of the depositary. Such money shall be secured by the depositary in which it is held to the same extent and in the same manner as required under Chapter 4, Part 2, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code, if deposited in a bank, or under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 16600) of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code if deposited in a savings and loan association and collateral pledged shall be maintained in a separate custody account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

1558.

Except as provided by Section 1558.5, all money in the Unemployment Administration Fund shall be expended solely for the purpose of defraying the cost of the administration of this division, including, but not limited to, payments authorized under Sections 1786 and 1788, and for no other purpose whatsoever, and all money, except money received pursuant to Section 1528.5, received from the federal government for the fund pursuant to Section 302 of the Social Security Act shall be expended solely for the purposes and in the amounts found necessary by the Secretary of Labor for the proper and efficient administration of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 767.)
-------------------------------------------

1558.5.

Money in the Unemployment Administration Fund may be expended for any cost of administration under this code, or for any expenditure by the department chargeable pursuant to state or federal law to another state or federal fund or appropriation or to a subvention, payment under a contract, or other source and expended for any purpose authorized by such state or federal law, in accordance with a plan or system of accrual cost accounting approved by the United States Department of Labor under which expenditures from the Unemployment Administration Fund are charged against advances from or subsequently reimbursed from another fund or funds or appropriation or a subvention or payment under a contract or other source to which the actual costs of such expenditures are chargeable. The director shall deposit in the Unemployment Administration Fund advances from another fund or funds or appropriation or subvention or contract payment or other source made in accordance with an approved plan or system under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1025, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1559.

All money in the Unemployment Administration Fund shall be deposited, administered, and disbursed in the same manner and under the same conditions and requirements as is provided by law for other special funds in the State Treasury, but the director may draw, without at the time furnishing vouchers and itemized statements, sums not to exceed in the aggregate an amount equal to 1 percent of the total disbursements made from the fund during the immediately preceding fiscal year to be used as a revolving fund where payment of compensation earned, traveling expense advances, payments under Sections 1786 and 1788, the fees, commissions and expenses authorized to be charged in connection with the levy of writs of attachment or execution under Article 7 (commencing with Section 26720) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code, or other cash payments are necessary. At the close of each fiscal year or at any other time, upon the demand of the Department of Finance, the money so drawn shall be accounted for and substantiated by vouchers and itemized statements submitted to and audited by the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1025, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

1560.

All money in the Unemployment Administration Fund, in excess of current requirements, and not otherwise invested, may be deposited by the State Treasurer in banks and savings and loan associations and otherwise held and invested by him in the same manner as provided by law in the case of other special funds in the State Treasury, and under the same rules and regulations that govern the deposit of other public funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

1561.

The State Treasurer is liable on his official bond for the faithful performance of his duties in connection with the Unemployment Administration Fund. This liability shall exist in addition to any liability upon any separate bond now existing or which may be given in the future. All sums recovered on the official bond for losses sustained by the Unemployment Administration Fund shall be deposited in that fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------

1562.

This state recognizes its obligations to replace, and pledges the faith of this state that funds shall be provided in the future, and applied to the replacement of, any money received from the federal government under Title 3 of the Social Security Act, any unencumbered balances in the Unemployment Administration Fund and any money granted to this state pursuant to the provisions of the Wagner-Peyser Act, which the Secretary of Labor finds have, because of any action or contingency, been lost or expended for purposes other than, or in amounts in excess of, those found necessary by the Secretary of Labor for the proper administration of this part and Parts 3 (commencing with Section 3501) and 4 (commencing with Section 4001) of this division. Such money shall be replaced within a reasonable time by money appropriated by the Legislature from the general funds of this state to the Unemployment Administration Fund. The director shall report to the Director of Finance, in the same manner as is provided generally for the submission of financial requirements for the ensuing year, and the Governor shall include in his or her next budget report to the Legislature, the amount required for such replacement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1025, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Contingent Fund [1585. - 1590.5.]

1585.

There is in the State Treasury a special fund known as the Employment Development Department Contingent Fund. The Employment Development Department Contingent Fund is the successor of the Department of Human Resources Development Contingent Fund. There shall be deposited in or transferred to this fund:

(a) All interest on contributions collected under this division, except as provided in Section 1595 and in Article 6 (commencing with Section 821) of Chapter 3.

(b) All penalties collected under this division, except as provided in Sections 1375.1, 1958, and 3654.2, and in Article 6 (commencing with Section 821) of Chapter 3.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all penalties and interest collected by the department pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) relating to the withholding of personal income tax.

(d) Rental payments or proceeds attributable to property derived from amounts expended from this fund.

(e) Interest on amounts expended from this fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1217, Sec. 8.   Effective September 29, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

1585.5.

(a) The director shall estimate the amount of penalties and interest collected by the department pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) relating to the withholding of personal income tax and shall transfer such amount to the Personal Income Tax Fund on a quarterly basis.

(b) For the 2014–15 fiscal year, the quarterly transfer to the Personal Income Tax Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) is suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 28, Sec. 96.   (SB 854)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1586.

All amounts in the Contingent Fund are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for refund of amounts collected and erroneously deposited therein, for interest payable under this division on refunds and judgments and for the administration of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1025, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

1586.5.

There is hereby appropriated from the Contingent Fund to the Employment Development Department an amount sufficient to augment an appropriation available from the Unemployment Trust Fund pursuant to Section 1528.5 for acquisition of real property, or for construction and equipment of state public works projects, in order to provide for payment of such public work projects for which an appropriation is available where such project cannot be undertaken because the estimate exceeds the amount available or bids received are in excess of the estimate, and upon such augmentation, contracts may be awarded therefor, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 14275 of the Government Code.

Allocations may be made for acquisition of real property in augmentation of appropriations made for acquisition of real property and which cannot be acquired because acquisition costs are in excess of the amounts provided in the appropriation.

Allocations may be made for purchase of equipment in augmentation of appropriations made from which purchase of equipment is authorized.

Expenditures shall be pursuant to executive orders of the Director of Finance upon approval of the State Public Works Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 941.)
-------------------------------------------

1588.

Any amount authorized to be expended from the Contingent Fund for administration may be transferred to the Unemployment Administration Fund, but any amount not needed for the purpose for which authorized shall, upon order of the Director of Finance, be retransferred to the Contingent Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

1589.

In lieu of filing claims for refund and interest payable on refunds against each of the funds from which an amount has been determined to be due under this division, the director may file a single claim with the State Controller showing the amount payable from each fund for payment from the Contingent Fund, and the Controller shall thereupon draw his warrant on the Contingent Fund and transfer the amounts certified by the director to be due from the Clearing Account—Unemployment Fund, the Employment Training Fund, the Unemployment Compensation Disability Fund, and the Personal Income Tax Fund, to the Contingent Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1169, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1590.

Except as provided by Section 1585.5, the director shall from time to time determine, and the State Controller shall from time to time transfer, the unencumbered balance of the Contingent Fund which at any time during any calendar year exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000) to the Unemployment Fund and the Disability Fund in the proportion that the year’s estimated revenues for penalties and interest relating to employer contributions attributable to the Unemployment Fund bear to the year’s estimated revenues for penalties and interest relating to worker contributions attributable to the Disability Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

1590.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Budget Act for each fiscal year shall appropriate the entire amount available in the Contingent Fund during the fiscal year for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1591 (as added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1146) by Stats. 1990, Ch. 216, Sec. 109.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.1. Building Fund [1591. - 1592.]

1591.

(a) There is in the State Treasury the Employment Development Department Building Fund. There shall be deposited in, or transferred to, the fund the following:

(1) All money received from the sale or lease of real property, the purchase, acquisition, or construction of which was made by an appropriation to the Employment Development Department for that specific purpose, which was amortized with federal funds paid out of the Unemployment Administration Fund.

(2) All interest earned by the fund.

(b) Money in the fund shall only be expended pursuant to appropriations by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1036, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1592.

The Employment Development Department Building Fund shall be used for the acquisition, construction, or renovation of department facilities, necessary for the director to administer this code and laws relating thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1036, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Benefit Audit Fund [1595. - 1596.]

1595.

There is in the State Treasury a special fund known as the Employment Development Department Benefit Audit Fund. There shall be deposited in, or transferred to, this fund those sums as specified pursuant to Section 1375.1, except all interest collected shall be deposited in this fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 783, Sec. 15.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1596.

All amounts in the Benefit Audit Fund are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for the refund of amounts collected and erroneously deposited therein, and shall be appropriated annually in the Budget Act by the Legislature for the financing of administrative costs associated with the discovery and collection of unemployment compensation benefit overpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1219, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Investments in or Expenditures for Property [1601. - 1602.]

1601.

When money other than Disability Fund money is used in the purchase of property and in the construction of buildings, and appurtenant facilities, or in the purchase of property, or in the construction of buildings, and appurtenant facilities, for the use of the department, or for the use of the department and other state agencies, the director may do any and all things necessary to protect the property including purchasing insurance against the loss of or damage to the property or the loss of use and occupancy of the property. Any transaction entered into by the director under this section shall be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

1602.

The department shall comply with all federal regulations with regard to the sale of property in which the federal government has an equity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1036, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Employment Training Fund [1610. - 1611.5.]

1610.

There is in the State Treasury a special fund known as the Employment Training Fund. There shall be deposited in or transferred to this fund all contributions collected from employers pursuant to Section 976.6. Costs incurred for the purposes specified in Section 1611 in fiscal year 1982–83 shall be reimbursed, and thereafter shall be annually appropriated by the Legislature from the Employment Training Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1075, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

1611.

Moneys in the Employment Training Fund shall be expended only for the purposes of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 10200) of Part 1 of Division 3, and for the costs of administering this article and Section 976.6, except those moneys may be used for any of the following:

(a) With the approval of the Legislature, the fund or contributions to it may be used to pay interest charged on federal loans to the Unemployment Fund.

(b) Commencing with allocations made to the Employment Training Panel in the 1992–93 fiscal year, any moneys allocated to the panel in a fiscal year that are not encumbered by the panel in that fiscal year shall revert to
 the Unemployment Insurance Fund.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the panel shall closely monitor program performance and expenditures for employment training programs administered by the panel, and that the panel shall expeditiously disencumber funds that are not needed for employment training program completion. Commencing with the 1992–93 fiscal year, those moneys that are disencumbered during the fiscal year that are not reencumbered during the same fiscal year shall revert to the Unemployment Insurance Fund.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the Employment Training Fund for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. However, interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund from the Employment Training Fund. Interest payable shall be computed at a rate determined by